Louisiana, session 2026, SB317.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 29:62(A) and 62(A)(1) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§62. Membership; officers and terms of office
A. The council shall be composed of nineteen twenty-one members. as
follows:
(1) Six Eight members of the council shall be comprised as follows:
(a) The governor of Louisiana, or his designee.
(b) The adjutant general of Louisiana, or his designee.
(c) The president of the Louisiana State Senate, or a state senator designated
by the president.
(d) The speaker of the Louisiana House of Representatives, or a state
representative designated by the speaker.
(e) The secretary of Louisiana Economic Development, or his designee.
(f) The secretary of the Department of Veterans Affairs, or his designee.
(g) The chair of the Senate Select Committee on Military and Veterans
Affairs, or his designee.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 317 ENROLLED
(h) The chair of the House of Representatives Special Committee on
Military and Veterans Affairs, or his designee.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.